California, session 20252026, SB1095.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(a) The California Constitution guarantees an inalienable right to privacy in Section 1 of Article I.(b) California law protects the right of people to seek reproductive care in the state and makes the state a refuge for transgender people and their families, however, these communities remain at risk as long as information collected in California is shared out of state.(c) California law recognizes that immigrants are a valuable and essential part of our state and that California must avoid entangling state and local resources with federal immigration enforcement, which wastes taxpayer resources and undermines public safety. However, as long as California continues to share information with out-of-state and federal agencies and entities, immigrants and their families in California remain at risk.(d) Fusion centers expose our lives and families to harm by giving federal and out-of-state agencies our personal information, including our location, identity, biometrics, and social media activity, without our consent and without regard to local and state laws.(e) Fusion centers are a collaboration between state and local law enforcement and federal agencies. According to a report of the United States Senate, fusion centers are state and local entities which are subject to, and governed by, the laws and regulations of their home states, and “the exact missions of individual fusion centers are largely beyond the authority of the federal government to determine.”(f) California currently operates at least six fusion centers spread across the state that were established by the Office of Emergency Services, formerly the Governor’s Office of Homeland Security. These include the State Threat Assessment Center, the Central California Intelligence Center, the Los Angeles Joint Regional Intelligence Center, the Northern California Regional Intelligence Center, the Orange County Intelligence Assessment Center, and the San Diego Law Enforcement Coordination Center.(g) While the stated priority of fusion centers was originally to prevent terrorism, there is little evidence that fusion centers have meaningfully contributed to this goal. Indeed, a report of the United States Senate could not find evidence of a fusion center uncovering an attack or contributing to disrupt an active plot.(h) Fusion centers have a track record of being used to target and surveil Muslim and Black, Indigenous, and people of color communities and activists, including tracking protest movements, disseminating conspiracy theories, creating intelligence reports about meditation circles and Juneteenth celebrations, and improperly flagging supporters of abortion rights and climate advocacy groups as suspicious.(i) By making information about people in California available to out-of-state and federal entities or agencies, fusion centers operating in California grant other governmental entities additional surveillance powers and pose an active threat to the safety and rights of Californians.(j) The Legislature must protect the rights and safety of people in California and update the law to prevent the exploitation and weaponization of information collected in California.SEC. 2. Section 8586.6 is added to the Government Code, to read:8586.6. (a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:(1) “Data broker” means a business that knowingly collects and sells to third parties the personal information of a consumer with whom the business does not have a direct relationship.(2) “Fusion center” means a state-owned center operated by the Office of Emergency Services and involving a law enforcement agency and a governmental entity that gather, analyze, and share or operated by an executive board consisting of local, state, and federal members, that gathers, analyses, and shares information, including, but not limited to, the State Threat Assessment Center, the Central California Intelligence Center, the Los Angeles Joint Regional Intelligence Center, the Northern California Regional Intelligence Center, the Orange County Intelligence Assessment Center, and the San Diego Law Enforcement Coordination Center.(3)“Governmental entity” means the federal government, any state government other than California, any local government outside of California, and any agency, subdivision, contractor, or representative thereof, or any agreed upon or functional agent thereof. (4)(3) “Immigration enforcement” includes any and all efforts to investigate, enforce, or assist in the investigation or enforcement of any federal civil immigration law, and also includes any and all efforts to investigate, enforce, or assist in the investigation or enforcement of any federal criminal immigration law that penalizes a person’s presence in, entry, or reentry to, or employment in, the United States.(5)(4) “Law enforcement agency” means a state or local law enforcement agency, including, but not limited to, any of the following:(A) A police department, including the police department of a transit agency, or any campus of the University of California, the California State University, or California Community Colleges.(B) A sheriff’s department.(C) A district attorney’s office.(D) A county probation department.(E) The Department of the California Highway Patrol.(F)The Office of Emergency Services.(G)The Department of Justice. (6)(5) “Personal information” means any information that is maintained by an agency that relates to, describes, or is reasonably capable of identifying or describing, an individual, including, but not limited to, the individual’s name, social security number, physical description, home address, biometric information, geolocation data, home telephone number, education, financial matters, and medical or employment history. It includes statements made by, or attributed to, the individual and constitutionally protected activities or involvement engaged in by the individual.(7)“Record” means any file or grouping of personal information about an individual that is maintained by an agency.(b)A fusion center operating in the State of California shall not participate in activity, cooperate, or disclose or share information with any governmental entity, or a contractor for any governmental entity, when participation, cooperation, or disclosure involves either of the following:(1)Assisting or furthering immigration enforcement, unless pursuant to judicial warrant or court order.(2)Investigating, interrogating, detaining, identifying, surveilling, detecting, or arresting people in violation of the prohibition against racial or identity profiling as provided in Section 13519 .4 of the Penal Code.(c)A fusion center shall not allow a governmental entity, contractor for a governmental entity, or private entity to work inside the fusion center when the Office of Emergency Services knows or has reason to know that the entity or contractor is presently engaged in or intends to engage in unlawful intelligence-gathering activity resulting in the violation of the constitutional or civil rights of a resident of California.(d)Fusion centers shall not provide office space for agencies engaged in immigration enforcement, or personnel, agents or subcontractors acting on their behalf, for use within the fusion centers.(b) (1) A law enforcement agency shall not participate in activity, cooperate, or disclose or share information with a fusion center unless it has entered into a written memorandum of understanding (MOU) with the fusion center pursuant to this subdivision.(2) Before a law enforcement agency may enter into an MOU with a fusion center pursuant to paragraph (1), the MOU shall be adopted by its elected governing body or council, or governing board if no elected body exists, in open session, and shall meet the following requirements:(A) The MOU does not require the agency to disclose any information it determines, in its sole discretion, it does not have the ability or authority to disclose or to perform any act is contrary to law.(B) The MOU prohibits reporting any activities protected by the First Amendment to the United States Constitution to the fusion center as suspicious activity reports.(C) The MOU affirms that all applicable state and local laws, rules, and regulations apply, including the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1) and the California Values Act (Chapter 17.25 (commencing with Section 7284) of Division 7 of Title 1).(D) The MOU provides that information shall not be shared with an individual employed by or contracting with a federal immigration enforcement agency or for immigration enforcement purposes, except pursuant to a judicial warrant.(E) The MOU sets forth additional privacy policies as determined by the law enforcement agency or its governing body, council, or board, including any policies required by Title 1.81.23 (commencing with Section 1798.90.5) of Part 4 of Division 3 of the Civil Code.(F) The MOU specifies that information shared between the law enforcement agency and the fusion center is to be used solely for authorized purposes consistent with federal, state, and local law.(G) The MOU specifies that all parties to the MOU must ensure that any individuals authorized to access shared information will not access such information by using access credentials or an authentication mechanism that is not unique to that individual.(H) The terms of the MOU cannot be changed without the approval of the appropriate governing body, council, or board.(I) The MOU specifies that a violation of its terms shall result in the termination of the MOU and the withdrawal of the law enforcement agency from participation in the fusion center until the Attorney General determines, at the next audit conducted pursuant to subdivision (c), that the violation has been remedied.(3) A law enforcement agency participating in activity, cooperating, or disclosing or sharing information with a fusion center at the time this section takes effect shall enter into an MOU with the fusion center pursuant to this subdivision on or before January 1, 2028.(4) An MOU lawfully entered into pursuant to this subdivision is valid for a period of four years but may be renewed upon readoption by the appropriate governing body, council, or board.(5) The local governing body or council, or the law enforcement agency if no governing body or council exists, shall publicly post a signed copy of the MOU on its internet website.(c) (1) Commencing January 1, 2029, and every four years thereafter, the Department of Justice shall conduct a performance and compliance audit of a representative sample of law enforcement agencies and fusion centers, including any law enforcement agency that has had its MOU terminated pursuant to subparagraph (I) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (b), and submit that audit to the Legislature pursuant to Section 9795.(2) The audit shall do both of the following:(A) Assess compliance with the terms, conditions, and privacy protections set forth in MOU entered into pursuant to subdivision (b).(B) Assess compliance by the fusion centers with any and all applicable state and federal law, including, but not limited to, the California Values Act (Chapter 17.25 (commencing with Section 7284) of Division 7 of Title 1) and any rights and privileges guaranteed by the California and United States Constitutions. (e)(d) State elected officials, local elected officials, officials and their accompanying staff may enter any fusion center for inspections, without prior notice or authorization. with 24 hours prior notice, provided they agree to adhere to any fusion center regulation or policy regarding the confidentiality, nondisclosure, and privacy of sensitive law enforcement data and personal information.(f)(1)(e) Starting on January 1, 2027, 2028, and each year thereafter, the Office of Emergency Services every fusion center in California shall submit a report to the Department of Justice that includes all of the following information collected from fusion centers: information:(A)(1) A list of all federal, state, and local governmental entities and data brokers, including their contractors and vendors, that participate in fusion centers, the fusion center, a summary of their role and function, and any proposed or existing memorandum of understanding (MOU) or written agreement or material amendments to an existing MOU between these entities regarding participation in fusion centers.(B)(2) Number of requests for information and suspicious activity reports submitted to the fusion center from a governmental entity or data broker law enforcement agency, data broker, or other entity, regardless of the reason.(C)(3) The general types of information collected by state and local law enforcement agencies and shared with federal law enforcement agencies while participating in fusion centers. the fusion center.(D)A summary highlighting the principal reasons that a governmental entity or data broker is requesting information from the fusion center.(4) A breakdown of the categories of state and federal criminal offenses that served as the basis for the information shared between local, state, and federal law enforcement agencies. (E)(5) How requests for information are submitted to the fusion center from a governmental entity or data broker and how quickly those are processed.(F)(6) An assessment of how the fusion centers process center processes incoming requests for information from governmental entities and data brokers.(G)(7) The number of times a federal law enforcement agency requested information or assessments from state law enforcement agencies and whether the state law enforcement agency determined that the reasonable suspicion standard was met for the activity.(H)(8) Any policies and standards for the use and retention of data gathered, processed, or analyzed by fusion centers. the fusion center.(I)A catalog of the information requested by and provided to requesting governmental entities and data brokers and a list of the personal information that is reasonably believed to have been part of those requests. (J)(9) The process for validating the authenticity of the requesting governmental entities and data brokers seeking information requests from the fusion center.(K)Whether a reasonable suspicion standard was met before state law enforcement agencies collected, maintained, or disseminated personal information through fusion centers.(L)(10) The types of agencies that staff each the fusion center, including, but not limited to, the number of staff per agency and a staffing chart or flowchart detailing staffing and how decisions are made about responding to requests from governmental entities or data brokers.(M)The number of actual or potential violations of state or local laws, policies, or department orders or procedures, the actions taken by the state law enforcement agency to address actual or potential violations, and recommendations to prevent future violations.(N)A certification, under penalty of perjury, that the fusion center has not engaged in any acts intended to influence the decisions or assessments of the Department of Justice.(2)The Department of Justice shall conduct an annual audit based on the report submitted pursuant to paragraph (1), and, notwithstanding Section 10231.5, submit that audit to the Legislature pursuant to Section 9795.(g)(1)Except as provided in paragraph (2), all records related to fusion centers are public records for purposes of the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1).(2)The Office of Emergency Services, fusion centers, and the Department of Justice shall not disclose the name, address, social security number, or other unique personal identifying information of individuals stopped, searched, or subjected to a property seizure, for purposes of this section.(11) Detailed procedures for requesting and conducting site visits requested by elected officials and their staff.SEC. 3.The Legislature finds and declares that Section 2 of this act, which adds Section 8586.6 to the Government Code, furthers, within the meaning of paragraph (7) of subdivision (b) of Section 3 of Article I of the California Constitution, the purposes of that constitutional section as it relates to the right of public access to the meetings of local public bodies or the writings of local public officials and local agencies. Pursuant to paragraph (7) of subdivision (b) of Section 3 of Article I of the California Constitution, the Legislature makes the following findings:Information about fusion centers, including the participating agencies and operational policies, will further transparency and ensure compliance with existing laws and regulations.SEC. 4.The Legislature finds and declares that Section 2 of this act, which adds Section 8586.6 to the Government Code, imposes a limitation on the public’s right of access to the meetings of public bodies or the writings of public officials and agencies within the meaning of Section 3 of Article I of the California Constitution. Pursuant to that constitutional provision, the Legislature makes the following findings to demonstrate the interest protected by this limitation and the need for protecting that interest:This act balances the right of the public to know the government’s information collection and sharing practices with preserving the confidentiality of information maintained about individuals.SEC. 5.No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.SEC. 3. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.